Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 6

Bonds and Finances of Housing Authorities

13-20-601. Types of bonds.

The housing authority has the power to issue bonds from time to time in its discretion, for any of its corporate purposes. It also has the power to issue refunding bonds for the purpose of paying or retiring bonds previously issued by it. The authority may issue such types of bonds as it may determine, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, bonds on which the principal of and interest on are payable from income and revenues of the authority and from grants or contributions from the federal government or other source. Such income and revenues securing the bonds may be:

Exclusively the income and revenues of the housing project financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of such bonds;

Exclusively the income and revenues of certain designated housing projects, whether or not they are financed in whole or in part with the proceeds of such bonds; or

The income and revenues of the authority generally.

Any such bonds may be additionally secured by a pledge of any income or revenues of the authority or, in certain instances as hereinafter provided, may be additionally secured by a mortgage of any housing project, projects or other property of the authority.

Neither the commissioners of the authority nor any person executing the bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds by reason of the issuance of such bonds.

The bonds and other obligations of the authority, and such bonds and obligations shall so state on their face, shall not be a debt of any city or municipality located within its boundaries or of the state, and neither the state nor any such city or municipality shall be liable thereon, nor in any event shall they be payable out of any funds or properties other than those of the authority. The bonds shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional, statutory or charter debt limitation or restriction. Bonds may be issued under this chapter, notwithstanding any debt or other limitation prescribed by any statute.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 14; 1939, ch. 74, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.13 (Williams, § 3647.14); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1101.

Cross-References. Exemption of bonds from taxation, § 67-5-206.

Limitation of action on bonds, § 28-3-113.

13-20-602. Form and sale of bonds.

The bonds of the authority shall be authorized by its resolution and shall be issued in one (1) or more series and shall bear such date or dates, mature at such time or times, not exceeding sixty (60) years from their respective dates, bear interest at such rate or rates, payable semiannually, be in such denominations, which may be made interchangeable, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such registration privileges, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms or redemption, with or without premium, as such resolution or its trust indenture or mortgage may provide.

The bonds, in the discretion of the authority, may be sold at public or private sale. If the bonds are sold at public sale, notice shall be published once at least ten (10) days prior to such sale in a newspaper having a general circulation in the city and in a financial newspaper published in the city of New York, New York, or the city of Chicago, Illinois. The bonds may be sold at such price or prices as the authority shall determine.

Whenever the authority contracts with a financial consultant, fiscal agent, municipal finance consultant or municipal securities underwriter-dealer to assist it in the issuance and marketing of such bonds or to market such bonds, such consultant, agent, or underwriter-dealer shall be licensed and maintain a permanent office or full-time branch office in this state prior to entering such contract.

Pending the authorization, preparation, execution or delivery of definitive bonds, the authority may issue interim certificates, or other temporary obligations to the purchaser of such bonds. Such interim certificates, or other temporary obligations, shall be in such form, contain such terms, conditions, and provisions, bear such date or dates, and evidence such agreements relating to their discharge or payment or delivery of definitive bonds as the authority may by resolution, trust indenture or mortgage determine.

In case any of the officers whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officers before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if they had remained in office until such delivery.

The authority has the power, out of any funds available therefor, to purchase any bonds issued by it at a price of not more than the principal amount thereof and the accrued interest; provided, that bonds payable exclusively from the revenues of a designated project or projects shall be purchased only out of any such revenues available therefor. All bonds so purchased shall be cancelled. This subsection (f) shall not apply to the redemption of bonds.

Any provisions of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds, interim certificates, or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter shall be fully negotiable.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 15; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.14 (Williams, § 3647.15); Acts 1970, ch. 564, § 1; 1976, ch. 729, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1102; Acts 1980, ch. 601, § 9.

Cross-References. Maximum effective rates of interest, § 47-14-103.

13-20-603. Trust indentures and mortgages — Power of authority to issue or incur obligation.

In connection with the issuance of bonds and/or the incurring of any obligation under a lease and in order to secure the payment of such bonds and/or obligations, the authority has the power to:

Pledge by resolution, trust indenture, mortgage, subject to the limitation hereinafter imposed, or other contract all or any part of its rents, fees or revenues;

Covenant against mortgaging all or any part of its property, real or personal, then owned or thereafter acquired, or against permitting or suffering any lien thereon;

Covenant with respect to limitations on its right to sell, lease or otherwise dispose of any housing project or any part thereof, or with respect to limitations on its right to undertake additional housing projects;

Covenant against pledging all or any part of its rents, fees and revenues to which its right then exists or the right to which may thereafter come into existence or against permitting or suffering any lien thereon;

Provide for the release of property, rents, fees and revenues from any pledge or mortgage, and reserve rights and powers in, or the right to dispose of, property which is subject to a pledge or mortgage;

As to the bonds to be issued pursuant to any resolution, trust indenture, mortgage or other instrument and as to the issuance of such bonds in escrow or otherwise, covenant regarding the use and disposition of the proceeds thereof;

Covenant as to what other or additional debt may be incurred by it;

Provide for the terms, form, registration, exchange, execution and authentication of bonds;

Provide for the replacement of lost, destroyed or mutilated bonds;

Covenant that the authority warrants the title to the premises;

Covenant as to the rents and fees to be charged, the amount (calculated as may be determined) to be raised each year or other period of time by rents, fees, and other revenues and as to the use and disposition to be made thereof;

Covenant as to the use of any or all of its property, real or personal;

Create or authorize the creation of special funds in which there shall be segregated:

The proceeds of any loan and/or grant;

All of the rents, fees and revenues of any housing project or projects or parts thereof;

Any moneys held for the payment of the costs of operation and maintenance of any such housing projects or as a reserve for the meeting of contingencies in the operation and maintenance thereof;

Any moneys held for the payment of the principal of and interest on its bonds or the sums due under its leases and/or as a reserve for such payments; and

Any moneys held for any other reserves or contingencies;

and to covenant as to the use and disposal of the moneys held in such funds;

Redeem the bonds, and covenant for their redemption and provide the terms and conditions thereof;

Covenant against extending the time for the payment of its bonds or interest thereon, directly or indirectly, by any means or in any manner;

Prescribe the procedure, if any, by which the terms of any contract with bondholders may be amended or abrogated, the amount of bonds the holders of which must consent thereto and the manner in which such consent may be given;

Covenant as to the maintenance of its property, the replacement thereof, the insurance to be carried thereon and the use and disposition of insurance moneys;

Vest in an obligee of the authority the right, in the event of the failure of the authority to observe or perform any covenant on its part to be kept or performed, cure any such default and advance any moneys necessary for such purposes, and the moneys so advanced may be made an additional obligation of the authority with such interest, security and priority as may be provided in any trust indenture, mortgage, lease or contract of the authority with reference thereto;

Covenant and prescribe as to the events of default and terms and conditions upon which any or all of its bonds shall become or may be declared due before maturity and as to the terms and conditions upon which such declaration and its consequences may be waived;

Covenant as to the rights, liabilities, powers, and duties arising upon the breach by it of any covenant, condition, or obligation;

Covenant to surrender possession of all or any part of any housing project or projects upon the happening of an event of default, as defined in the contract, and vest in an obligee the right without judicial proceedings to take possession of and use, operate, manage and control such housing projects or any part thereof, and collect and receive all rents, fees and revenues arising therefrom in the same manner as the authority itself might do, and to dispose of the moneys collected in accordance with the agreement of the authority with such obligee;

Vest in a trustee or trustees the rights to enforce any covenant made to secure, pay, or in relation to the bonds, provide for the powers and duties of such trustee or trustees, limit liabilities thereof and provide the terms and conditions upon which the trustee or trustees or the holders of bonds or any proportion of them may enforce any such covenant;

Make covenants other than, and in addition to, the covenants herein expressly authorized, of like or different character;

Execute all instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers herein granted or in the performance of its covenants or duties, which may contain such covenants and provisions in addition to those above specified as the government or any purchaser of the bonds of the authority may reasonably require; and

Make all covenants and do any and all acts and things which may be necessary or convenient or desirable in order to secure its bonds, or which tend to make the bonds more marketable, notwithstanding that such covenants, acts or things may not be enumerated herein, it being the intention hereof to give the authority power to do all things in the issuance of bonds, in the provisions for their security that are not inconsistent with the constitution of the state, and no consent or approval of any judge or court shall be required therefor; provided, that the authority shall have no power to mortgage all or any part of its property, real or personal, except as provided in § 13-20-604.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 16; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.15 (Williams, § 3647.16); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1103.

13-20-604. Power to mortgage when project financed with aid of government.

In connection with any project financed in whole or in part or otherwise aided by a government, whether through a donation of money or property, a loan, the insurance or guarantee of a loan, or otherwise, the authority also has the power to mortgage all or any part of its property, real or personal, then owned or thereafter acquired and thereby to:

Vest in a government the right, upon the happening of an event of default, as defined in such mortgage, foreclose such mortgage through judicial proceedings or through the exercise of a power of sale without judicial proceedings, so long as a government shall be the holder of any of the bonds secured by such mortgage;

Vest in a trustee or trustees the right, upon the happening of an event of default, as defined in such mortgage, foreclose such mortgage through judicial proceedings or through the exercise of a power of sale without judicial proceedings;

Vest in other obligees the right to foreclose such mortgage by judicial proceedings; and

Vest in any obligee, including a government, the right, in foreclosing any mortgage as aforementioned, foreclose such mortgage as to all or such part or parts of the property covered thereby as such obligee, in its absolute discretion, shall elect; the institution, prosecution and conclusion of any such foreclosure proceedings and/or sale of any such parts of the mortgaged property shall not affect in any manner or to any extent the lien of the mortgage on the parts of the mortgaged property not included in such proceedings or not sold as aforementioned.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 17; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.16 (Williams, § 3647.17); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1104.

13-20-605. Remedies of an obligee of authority.

An obligee of the authority has the right, in addition to all other rights which may be conferred on such obligee, subject only to any contractual restrictions binding upon such obligee:

By mandamus, suit, action or proceeding in law or equity, all of which may be joined in one (1) action, to compel the authority, and the commissioners, officers, agents or employees thereof, to perform each and every term, provision and covenant contained in any contract of the authority, and to require the carrying out of any or all covenants and agreements of the authority and the fulfillment of all duties imposed upon the authority by this chapter;

By suit, action or proceeding in equity to enjoin any acts or things which may be unlawful, or the violation of any of the rights of such obligee of the authority; and

By suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction to acquire possession of any housing project or any part thereof to be surrendered to any obligee having the right to such possession pursuant to any contract of the authority.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 18; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.17 (Williams, § 3647.18); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1105.

13-20-606. Remedies conferrable upon authority by mortgage or trust indenture.

An authority has the power by its trust indenture, mortgage, lease or other contract to confer upon any obligee holding or representing a specified amount in bonds, leases or other obligations, the right upon the happening of an “event of default” as defined in such instrument, by suit, action or proceeding in any court of competent jurisdiction, to:

Obtain the appointment of a receiver of any housing project of the authority or any part or parts thereof. If a receiver is appointed, the receiver may enter and take possession of such housing project or any part or parts thereof and operate and maintain same, and collect and receive all fees, rents, revenues, or other charges thereafter arising therefrom in the same manner as the authority itself might do, and shall keep such moneys in a separate account or accounts and apply the same in accordance with the obligations of the authority as the court shall direct; and

Require the authority and the commissioners thereof to account as if it and they were the trustees of an express trust.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 19; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.18 (Williams, § 3647.19); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1106.

13-20-607. Remedies and rights cumulative.

All the rights and remedies hereinabove conferred shall be cumulative and in addition to all other rights and remedies that may be conferred upon such obligee of the authority by law or by any contract with the authority.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 20; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.19 (Williams, § 3647.20); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1107.

13-20-608. Limitations on remedies of obligee.

No interest of the authority in any property, real or personal, shall be subject to sale by the foreclosure of a mortgage thereon, either through judicial proceedings or the exercise of a power of sale contained in such mortgage, except in the case of the mortgages provided for in § 13-20-604.

All property of the authority shall be exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, and no execution or other judicial process shall issue against same.

No judgment against the authority shall be a charge or lien upon its property, real or personal.

This section shall not apply to or limit the right of an obligee to foreclose any mortgage of the authority provided for in § 13-20-604, and, in case of a foreclosure sale thereunder, to obtain a judgment or decree for any deficiency due on the indebtedness secured thereby and issued on the credit of the authority. Such deficiency judgment or decree shall be a lien and charge upon the property of the authority which may be levied on and sold by virtue of an execution or other judicial process for the purpose of satisfying such deficiency judgment or decree.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 21; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.20 (Williams, § 3647.21); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1108.

13-20-609. Subordination of mortgage to agreement with government.

The authority may agree in any mortgage made by it that such mortgage shall be subordinate to a contract for the supervision by a government of the operation of improvements thereon; in such event, any purchaser or purchasers at a sale of the property of an authority pursuant to a foreclosure of such mortgage or any other remedy in connection therewith shall obtain title subject to such contract.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 22; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.21 (Williams, § 3647.22); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1109.

13-20-610. Contracts with federal government.

In addition to the powers conferred upon the authority by other provisions of this chapter, the authority is empowered to borrow money or accept grants from the federal government for or in aid of any housing project which such authority is authorized to undertake, to take over any land acquired by the federal government for the construction or operation of a housing project, to take over or lease or manage any housing project constructed or owned by the federal government, and to these ends to enter into such contracts, mortgages, trust indentures, leases or other agreements as the federal government may require, including agreements that the federal government shall have the right to supervise and approve the construction, maintenance and operation of such housing project. It is the purpose and intent of such law to authorize every authority to do any and all things necessary to secure the financial aid and the cooperation of the federal government in the undertaking, construction, maintenance and operation of any housing project which the authority is empowered to undertake.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 23; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.22 (Williams, § 3647.23); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1110.

13-20-611. Agreement to sell as security for obligations to federal government.

In any contract or amendatory or superseding contract for a loan and annual contributions heretofore or hereafter entered into between a housing authority and the federal government with respect to any housing project undertaken by the housing authority, any such housing authority is authorized to make such covenants, including covenants with holders of bonds issued by such authority for purposes of the project involved, and to confer upon the federal government such rights and remedies, as the housing authority deems necessary to assure the fulfillment of the purposes for which the project was undertaken. In any such contract, the housing authority may, notwithstanding any other provision of law, agree to sell and convey the project, including all lands appertaining thereto, to which such contract relates, to the federal government upon the occurrence of such conditions, or upon such defaults on bonds for which any of the annual contributions provided in the contract are pledged, as may be prescribed in such contract, and at a price, which may include the assumption by the federal government of the payment, when due, of the principal of and interest on outstanding bonds of the housing authority issued for purposes of the project involved, determined as prescribed therein and upon such other terms and conditions as are therein provided. Any such other housing authority is authorized to enter into such supplementary contracts, and to execute such conveyances, as may be necessary to carry out the provisions hereof. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, any contracts or supplementary contracts or conveyances made or executed pursuant to this section shall not be or constitute a mortgage within the meaning or for the purposes of any of the laws of this state.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 20, § 45, as added by Acts 1943, ch. 22, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29I (Williams, § 3647.29u); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1111.

13-20-612. Housing authority obligations guaranteed by federal government eligible collateral as security for deposit of funds.

Wherever, by statute of this state, collateral is required as security for the deposit of public or other funds, or deposits are required to be made with any public official or department, or an investment of capital or surplus, or a reserve or other fund, is required to be maintained consisting of designated securities, notes and bonds insured by the federal housing administrator and debentures issued by the federal housing administrator and obligations of national mortgage associations shall be eligible for such purposes; provided, that such obligations shall be guaranteed as to payment by the federal government or a branch thereof.

Acts 1937, ch. 83, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.17A (Williams, § 3647.41); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1112.

Cross-References. Housing authority bonds, security for public deposits and legal investments, § 13-20-207.

13-20-613. Investment by municipality in bonds of authority.

Any municipality may purchase or legally invest in any of the bonds of a housing authority and exercise all of the rights of any holder of such bonds.

Acts 1935 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 45, § 9, as added by Acts 1937, ch. 225, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29Y (Williams, § 3647.36b); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-1113.

13-20-614. Taxes pledged for repayment of indebtedness for redevelopment projects.

An authority is hereby authorized and empowered to irrevocably pledge to the payment of principal of and interest on any bonds, loans or other indebtedness incurred by the authority to finance or refinance, in whole or in part, the project facilities authorized under subsection (c), that portion of taxes which pursuant to § 13-20-205(a)(2) is to be paid into the special fund of the authority. Such portion of taxes shall be considered “revenues” within the meaning of § 13-20-601.

The authority shall create a special fund or funds for the sole purpose of paying the principal of and interest on such bonds, loans or other indebtedness and into which taxes allocated to the authority pursuant to § 13-20-205(a)(2) will be, from time to time, deposited. The authority shall be obligated and bound to set aside from such taxes an amount sufficient to pay such indebtedness as the same shall become due, and, as provided in the proceedings authorizing the incurrence of any indebtedness of the authority, to maintain adequate reserves for the payment of such indebtedness.

The special fund shall be used solely for the payment of principal of and interest, and redemption premiums, on bonds, loans and other indebtedness incurred by the authority in connection with the redevelopment project financed from the proceeds of such bonds, loans or other indebtedness.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, in order to secure any bonds, notes or other indebtedness incurred by the authority, the authority shall have the power to mortgage all or any part of its property, real or personal, then owned or thereafter acquired, and thereby to vest in a trustee or trustees the right, upon the happening of an event of default, as defined in such mortgage, to foreclose such mortgage through judicial proceedings or through the exercise of a power of sale without judicial proceedings.

Acts 1978, ch. 854, § 4; T.C.A., § 13-1114.